Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-117.05
Rules and regulations; statutes; commission; provide copies; fee authorized.

The commission shall provide without charge to any person licensed under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act a set of rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, a copy of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, and any other information which the commission deems important in the area of liquor control in the State of Nebraska. The information may be printed in a booklet, a pamphlet, or any other form the commission may determine to be appropriate. The commission may update such material as often as it deems necessary. The commission may provide such material to any other person upon request and may charge a fee for the material. The fee shall be reasonable and shall not exceed any reasonable or necessary costs of producing the material for distribution.

Laws 1989, LB 70, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 202, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 6.